Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 6. Beneficiaries

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-601.
Beneficiaries.

The articles of formation or operating agreement of a statutory foundation may provide for the distribution of property of the foundation to one (1) or more beneficiaries.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a beneficiary of a statutory foundation shall not have the right to, or interest in, property of the statutory foundation unless such right or interest arises by express terms stated in the operating agreement of the statutory foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-602.
Interests; units and shares.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 2.

No creditor of a beneficiary shall have any right to obtain possession of, or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to, the property of the statutory foundation.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 2.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the operating agreement, the transferee of the beneficial interest of a beneficiary in the statutory foundation shall have all the rights and duties of a beneficiary of the statutory foundation, except those provided in subsection (f) of this section.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the operating agreement, if a beneficiary of a statutory foundation becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the beneficiary has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the statutory foundation with respect to the distribution. The operating agreement may provide for the establishment of record dates with respect to distributions by a statutory foundation.

The operating agreement may authorize the statutory foundation to issue units or shares having the same or separate rights, powers or duties with respect to specified property, payments or other interests of the statutory foundation. The operating agreement may provide the terms or conditions of units or shares issued by the statutory foundation.

A person may receive units or shares issued pursuant to subsection (g) of this section without:

Being or becoming a beneficiary or contributor of the statutory foundation;

Acquiring any rights or duties of a beneficiary of the statutory foundation; or

Making or being obligated to make a contribution to the statutory foundation.

No creditor of a holder of units or shares issued by a statutory foundation shall have any right to obtain possession of, or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to, the property of the statutory foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, by ch. 98, §§ 1, 2, rewrote the section heading, which read, "Beneficial interest"; substituted "a beneficiary" for "the beneficial owner" in (c); rewrote (e), which read, "Except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, the transferee of the beneficial interest of a beneficial owner in the statutory foundation shall only be entitled to receive the share of profits and the return of contributions to which the beneficial owner otherwise would be entitled. In the absence of the unanimous written consent of the owners of all other beneficial interests and of all directors of the foundation, and except to the extent otherwise provided in the governing instrument, the transferee of the beneficial interest of a beneficial owner shall have no right to participate in or be kept apprised of the affairs of the foundation or to become a beneficial owner of a beneficial interest in the foundation"; in the first sentence of (f), substituted "operating agreement, if a beneficiary of a statutory foundation" for "governing instrument, at the time a beneficial owner," "beneficiary" for "owner," in the second sentence, substituted "The operating agreement" for "A governing instrument," deleted "allocations and" preceding "distributions"; added (g) through (j); and repealed (a), (b) and (d).

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-603.
Limitation of transferability of rights.

Subject to the operating agreement of the statutory foundation, a beneficial interest in a foundation is transferable.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.